District of Columbia statutes.
47-425

Rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

Repealed.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-20, § 5, 24 DCR 3339
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 12(c), 51 DCR 881
1981 Ed., § 47-425.
1973 Ed., § 47-335.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 12(d) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).